Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-601
State Treasurer; residence office; location.

The State Treasurer shall reside and keep his office at the seat of government.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 17, p. 24;

R.S.1913, § 5576;

C.S.1922, § 4880;

C.S.1929, § 84-601;

R.S.1943, § 84-601.